Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.025

Secretary—Appointment—Salary.

(1) The executive head and appointing authority of the department is the secretary. The secretary shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The secretary shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040. If a vacancy occurs in the position of secretary while the senate is not in session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of the senate when the governor's nomination for the office of secretary shall be presented.

(2) The secretary may employ staff members, who shall be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to administer this chapter and such other duties as may be authorized by law. The employment of such additional staff shall be in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided. The secretary may delegate any power or duty vested in him or her by chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. or other law, including authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) The internal affairs of the department are under the control of the secretary in order that the secretary may manage the department in a flexible and intelligent manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically limited by law, the secretary has the complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The secretary may create the administrative structures in consultation with the office of innovation, alignment, and accountability established in RCW 43.216.035, except as otherwise specified in law, and the secretary may employ personnel as may be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 102; 2006 c 265 s 104. Formerly RCW 43.215.030.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: "Sections 102, 104 through 115, 201 through 227, 301 through 337, 401 through 419, 501 through 513, and 801 through 803 and 805 through 822 of this act take effect July 1, 2018." [ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 825.]